Colorado, session 2025B, SB25B-008.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal and reenact,
with amendments, part 17 of article 1 of title 6 as follows:
PART 17
DIGITAL-ASSISTED DISCRIMINATION PROHIBITED
6-1-1701. Short title. THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS PART 17 IS THE
"TECHNOLOGY-NEUTRAL ANTI-DISCRIMINATION CLARIFICATION ACT OF
2026".
6-1-1702. Legislative declaration. (1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) DISCRIMINATION BASED ON PROTECTED CHARACTERISTICS IS
UNLAWFUL IN COLORADO WHETHER IT OCCURS IN HOUSING, EMPLOYMENT,
PUBLIC ACCOMMODATIONS, EDUCATION, CREDIT, OR ANY OTHER CONTEXT
COVERED BY STATE CIVIL RIGHTS STATUTES;
(b) ADVANCES IN SOFTWARE, AUTOMATION, ALGORITHMIC
DECISION-MAKING, ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, AND OTHER DIGITAL
TECHNOLOGIES DO NOT CREATE A LAWFUL AVENUE TO ENGAGE IN
CONDUCT THAT EXISTING LAW ALREADY PROHIBITS; AND
(c) CLARIFYING THAT DISCRIMINATORY CONDUCT REMAINS
UNLAWFUL REGARDLESS OF THE TOOLS USED WILL:
(I) AFFIRM THAT IMPLEMENTING ILLEGAL DISCRIMINATION
THROUGH A DIGITAL MECHANISM CONFERS NO LEGAL IMMUNITY;
(II) ENSURE COLORADO'S CIVIL RIGHTS STATUTES APPLY
CONSISTENTLY ACROSS PRESENT AND FUTURE TECHNOLOGIES, WITHOUT
PRIVILEGING OR DISADVANTAGING ANY PARTICULAR METHOD OF
-2- SB25B-008

IMPLEMENTATION; AND
(III) AVOID IMPOSING VICARIOUS LIABILITY ON TECHNOLOGY
DEVELOPERS THAT NEITHER INTEND NOR KNOWINGLY FACILITATE
DISCRIMINATORY CONDUCT.
6-1-1703. Digital-assisted discrimination prohibited. ALL
PROHIBITIONS ON DISCRIMINATION CONTAINED IN A STATUTE OF THIS
STATE APPLY WITH FULL FORCE AND EFFECT REGARDLESS OF WHETHER
THE CHALLENGED CONDUCT IS EXECUTED, FACILITATED, OR SCALED, IN
WHOLE OR IN PART, BY MEANS OF A DIGITAL, AUTOMATED, ALGORITHMIC,
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, MACHINE LEARNING, OR OTHER
TECHNOLOGICAL PROCESS.
6-1-1704. Rules of construction. (1) AS USED IN THIS PART 17,
"DIGITAL", "AUTOMATED", "ALGORITHMIC", "ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE",
"MACHINE LEARNING", AND "OTHER TECHNOLOGICAL PROCESS" ARE
ILLUSTRATIVE AND NONEXHAUSTIVE TERMS AND ENCOMPASS PRESENT
AND FUTURE MEANS OF COMPUTATION, COMMUNICATION, AND
DECISION-MAKING.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS PART 17 ALTERS THE LIST OF PROTECTED
CHARACTERISTICS ENUMERATED ELSEWHERE IN STATUTE.
(3) A CREATOR, PUBLISHER, OR DISTRIBUTOR OF TECHNOLOGY IS
LIABLE UNDER THIS PART 17 ONLY IF THAT PARTY INTENTIONALLY
ENGAGES IN, DIRECTS, OR KNOWINGLY AIDS THE UNDERLYING
DISCRIMINATORY CONDUCT.
(4) THIS PART 17 DOES NOT ALTER EXISTING BURDENS OF PROOF,
DEFENSES, AND REMEDIES APPLICABLE TO DISCRIMINATION CLAIMS.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect January 1, 2026; except that, if a
-3- SB25B-008

referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general
assembly, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November
2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official
declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
-4- SB25B-008